Washington statutes.
RCW 3.54.020

Powers and duties.

The district courts shall prescribe the duties of the clerk and deputy clerks. Such duties shall include all of the requirements of RCW 3.62.020 and 3.62.040 as now or hereafter amended and the receipt of bail and additionally the power to:

(1) Accept and enter pleas;

(2) Receive bail as set by the court;

(3) Set cases for trial;

(4) Administer oaths.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 241 s 1; 1971 c 73 s 7; 1961 c 299 s 99.]